The Project Gutenberg eBook, Black Beauty, Young Folks' Edition, by Anna
Sewell


This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.net





Title: Black Beauty, Young Folks' Edition

Author: Anna Sewell

Release Date: March 31, 2004  [eBook #11860]

Language: English


***START OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK BLACK BEAUTY, YOUNG FOLKS'
EDITION***


E-text prepared by Paul Murray and Project Gutenberg Distributed
Proofreaders from images provided by The Internet Archive Children's
Library



Note: Project Gutenberg also has an HTML version of this
      file which includes the original illustrations.
      See 11860-h.htm or 11860-h.zip:
      (http://www.ibiblio.org/gutenberg/1/1/8/6/11860/11860-h/11860-h.htm)
      or
      (http://www.ibiblio.org/gutenberg/1/1/8/6/11860/11860-h.zip)





BLACK BEAUTY

YOUNG FOLKS' EDITION

1902






[Illustration]



BLACK BEAUTY




CHAPTER I


MY EARLY HOME

The first place that I can well remember was a pleasant meadow with a
pond of clear water in it. Over the hedge on one side we looked into a
plowed field, and on the other we looked over a gate at our master's
house, which stood by the roadside. While I was young I lived upon my
mother's milk, as I could not eat grass. In the daytime I ran by her
side, and at night I lay down close by her. When it was hot we used to
stand by the pond in the shade of the trees, and when it was cold we had
a warm shed near the grove.

There were six young colts in the meadow beside me; they were older than
I was. I used to run with them, and had great fun; we used to gallop all
together round the field, as hard as we could go. Sometimes we had
rather rough play, for they would bite and kick, as well as gallop.

[Illustration]

One day, when there was a good deal of kicking, my mother whinnied to me
to come to her, and then she said: "I wish you to pay attention to what
I am going to say. The colts who live here are very good colts, but they
are cart-horse colts, and they have not learned manners. You have been
well-bred and well-born; your father has a great name in these parts,
and your grandfather won the cup at the races; your grandmother had the
sweetest temper of any horse I ever knew, and I think you have never
seen me kick or bite. I hope you will grow up gentle and good, and never
learn bad ways; do your work with a good will, lift your feet up well
when you trot, and never bite or kick even in play."

[Illustration]

I have never forgotten my mother's advice. I knew she was a wise old
horse, and our master thought a great deal of her. Her name was Duchess,
but he called her Pet.

Our master was a good, kind man. He gave us good food, good lodging and
kind words; he spoke as kindly to us as he did to his little children.
We were all fond of him, and my mother loved him very much. When she saw
him at the gate she would neigh with joy, and trot up to him. He would
pat and stroke her and say, "Well, old Pet, and how is your little
Darkie?" I was a dull black, so he called me Darkie; then he would give
me a piece of bread, which was very good, and sometimes he brought a
carrot for my mother. All the horses would come to him, but I think we
were his favorites. My mother always took him to town on a market-day in
a light gig.

We had a ploughboy, Dick, who sometimes came into our field to pluck
blackberries from the hedge. When he had eaten all he wanted he would
have what he called fun with the colts, throwing stones and sticks at
them to make them gallop. We did not much mind him, for we could gallop
off; but sometimes a stone would hit and hurt us.

One day he was at this game, and did not know that the master was in the
next field, watching what was going on; over the hedge he jumped in a
snap, and catching Dick by the arm, he gave him such a box on the ear as
made him roar with the pain and surprise. As soon as we saw the master
we trotted up nearer to see what went on.

"Bad boy!" he said, "bad boy! to chase the colts. This is not the first
time, but it shall be the last. There--take your money and go home; I
shall not want you on my farm again." So we never saw Dick any more. Old
Daniel, the man who looked after the horses, was just as gentle as our
master; so we were well off.




CHAPTER II


THE HUNT

Before I was two years old a circumstance happened which I have never
forgotten. It was early in the spring; there had been a little frost in
the night, and a light mist still hung over the woods and meadows. I and
the other colts were feeding at the lower part of the field when we
heard what sounded like the cry of dogs. The oldest of the colts raised
his head, pricked his ears, and said, "There are the hounds!" and
cantered off, followed by the rest of us, to the upper part of the
field, where we could look over the hedge and see several fields beyond.
My mother and an old riding horse of our master's were also standing
near, and seemed to know all about it. "They have found a hare," said my
mother, "and if they come this way we shall see the hunt."

And soon the dogs were all tearing down the field of young wheat next to
ours. I never heard such a noise as they made. They did not bark, nor
howl, nor whine, but kept on a "yo! yo, o, o! yo, o, o!" at the top of
their voices. After them came a number of men on horseback, all
galloping as fast as they could. The old horses snorted and looked
eagerly after them, and we young colts wanted to be galloping with them,
but they were soon away into the fields lower down; here it seemed as if
they had come to a stand; the dogs left off barking and ran about every
way with their noses to the ground.

"They have lost the scent," said the old horse; "perhaps the hare will
get off."

"What hare?" I said.

"Oh, I don't know what hare; likely enough it may be one of our own
hares out of the woods; any hare they can find will do for the dogs and
men to run after"; and before long the dogs began their "yo; yo, o, o!"
again, and back they came all together at full speed, making straight
for our meadow at the part where the high bank and hedge overhang the
brook.

"Now we shall see the hare," said my mother; and just then a hare, wild
with fright, rushed by and made for the woods. On came the dogs; they
burst over the bank, leaped the stream and came dashing across the
field, followed by the huntsmen. Several men leaped their horses clean
over, close upon the dogs. The hare tried to get through the fence; it
was too thick, and she turned sharp around to make for the road, but it
was too late; the dogs were upon her with their wild cries; we heard
one shriek, and that was the end of her. One of the huntsmen rode up and
whipped off the dogs, who would soon have torn her to pieces. He held
her up by the leg, torn and bleeding, and all the gentlemen seemed well
pleased.

[Illustration]

As for me, I was so astonished that I did not at first see what was
going on by the brook; but when I did look, there was a sad sight; two
fine horses were down; one was struggling in the stream, and the other
was groaning on the grass. One of the riders was getting out of the
water covered with mud, the other lay quite still.

"His neck is broken," said my mother.

"And serves him right, too," said one of the colts.

I thought the same, but my mother did not join with us.

"Well, no," she said, "you must not say that; but though I am an old
horse, and have seen and heard a great deal, I never yet could make out
why men are so fond of this sport; they often hurt themselves, often
spoil good horses, and tear up the fields, and all for a hare, or a fox,
or a stag, that they could get more easily some other way; but we are
only horses, and don't know."

While my mother was saying this, we stood and looked on. Many of the
riders had gone to the young man; but my master was the first to raise
him. His head fell back and his arms hung down, and every one looked
very serious. There was no noise now; even the dogs were quiet, and
seemed to know that something was wrong. They carried him to our
master's house. I heard afterwards that it was the squire's only son, a
fine, tall young man, and the pride of his family.

They were now riding in all directions--to the doctor's, and to Squire
Gordon's, to let him know about his son. When Bond, the farrier, came to
look at the black horse that lay groaning on the grass, he felt him all
over, and shook his head; one of his legs was broken. Then some one ran
to our master's house and came back with a gun; presently there was a
loud bang and a dreadful shriek, and then all was still; the black horse
moved no more.

My mother seemed much troubled; she said she had known that horse for
years, and that his name was Rob Roy; he was a good horse, and there was
no vice in him. She never would go to that part of the field afterwards.

[Illustration]

Not many days after, we heard the church-bell tolling for a long time,
and looking over the gate, we saw a long strange black coach that was
covered with black cloth and was drawn by black horses; after that came
another and another and another, and all were black, while the bell kept
tolling, tolling. They were carrying young Gordon to the church-yard to
bury him. He would never ride again. What they did with Rob Roy I never
knew; but 'twas all for one little hare.




CHAPTER III


MY BREAKING IN

I was now beginning to grow handsome, my coat had grown fine and soft,
and was bright black. I had one white foot and a pretty white star on my
forehead. I was thought very handsome; my master would not sell me till
I was four years old; he said lads ought not to work like men, and colts
ought not to work like horses till they were quite grown up.

When I was four years old, Squire Gordon came to look at me. He examined
my eyes, my mouth, and my legs; he felt them all down, and then I had to
walk and trot and gallop before him; he seemed to like me, and said,
"When he has been well broken in he will do very well." My master said
he would break me in himself, and he lost no time about it, for the next
day he began.

Every one may not know what breaking in is, therefore I will describe
it. It means to teach a horse to wear a saddle and bridle, and to carry
on his back a man, woman, or child; to go just the way they wish, and to
go quietly. Besides this, he has to learn to wear a collar, and a
breeching, and to stand still while they are put on; then to have a cart
or a buggy fixed behind, so that he cannot walk or trot without dragging
it after him; and he must go fast or slow, just as his driver wishes. He
must never start at what he sees, nor speak to other horses, nor bite,
nor kick, nor have any will of his own, but always do his master's will,
even though he may be very tired or hungry; but the worst of all is,
when his harness is once on, he may neither jump for joy nor lie down
for weariness. So you see this breaking in is a great thing.

[Illustration]

I had, of course, long been used to a halter and a head-stall, and to be
led about in the fields and lanes quietly, but now I was to have a bit
and bridle; my master gave me some oats as usual, and after a good deal
of coaxing he got the bit into my mouth and the bridle fixed, but it was
a nasty thing! Those who have never had a bit in their mouths cannot
think how bad it feels; a great piece of cold hard steel as thick as a
man's finger to be pushed into one's mouth, between one's teeth, and
over one's tongue, with the ends coming out at the corner of your
mouth, and held fast there by straps over your head, under your throat,
round your nose, and under your chin; so that no way in the world can
you get rid of the nasty hard thing; it is very bad! at least I thought
so; but I knew my mother always wore one when she went out, and all
horses did when they were grown up; and so, what with the nice oats, and
what with my master's pats, kind words, and gentle ways, I got to wear
my bit and bridle.

Next came the saddle, but that was not half so bad; my master put it on
my back very gently, while Old Daniel held my head; he then made the
girths fast under my body, patting and talking to me all the time; then
I had a few oats, then a little leading about; and this he did every day
till I began to look for the oats and the saddle. At length, one
morning, my master got on my back and rode me around the meadow on the
soft grass. It certainly did feel queer; but I must say I felt rather
proud to carry my master, and as he continued to ride me a little every
day, I soon became accustomed to it.

The next unpleasant business was putting on the iron shoes; that too was
very hard at first. My master went with me to the smith's forge, to see
that I was not hurt or got any fright. The blacksmith took my feet in
his hand, one after the other, and cut away some of the hoof. It did not
pain me, so I stood still on three legs till he had done them all. Then
he took a piece of iron the shape of my foot, and clapped it on, and
drove some nails through the shoe quite into my hoof, so that the shoe
was firmly on. My feet felt very stiff and heavy, but in time I got used
to it.

And now having got so far, my master went on to break me to harness;
there were more new things to wear. First, a stiff heavy collar just on
my neck, and a bridle with great side-pieces against my eyes, called
blinkers, and blinkers indeed they were, for I could not see on either
side, but only straight in front of me; next there was a small saddle
with a nasty stiff strap that went right under my tail; that was the
crupper. I hated the crupper--to have my long tail doubled up and poked
through that strap was almost as bad as the bit. I never felt more like
kicking, but of course I could not kick such a good master, and so in
time I got used to everything, and could do my work as well as my
mother.

I must not forget to mention one part of my training, which I have
always considered a very great advantage. My master sent me for a
fortnight to a neighboring farmer's, who had a meadow which was skirted
on one side by the railway. Here were some sheep and cows, and I was
turned in among them.

I shall never forget the first train that ran by. I was feeding quietly
near the pales which separated the meadow from the railway, when I heard
a strange sound at a distance, and before I knew whence it came--with a
rush and a clatter, and a puffing out of smoke--a long black train of
something flew by, and was gone almost before I could draw my breath. I
galloped to the further side of the meadow, and there I stood snorting
with astonishment and fear. In the course of the day many other trains
went by, some more slowly; these drew up at the station close by, and
sometimes made an awful shriek and groan before they stopped. I thought
it very dreadful, but the cows went on eating very quietly, and hardly
raised their heads as the black, frightful thing came puffing and
grinding past. For the first few days I could not feed in peace; but as
I found that this terrible creature never came into the field, or did me
any harm, I began to disregard it, and very soon I cared as little about
the passing of a train as the cows and sheep did.

Since then I have seen many horses much alarmed and restive at the sight
or sound of a steam engine; but, thanks to my good master's care, I am
as fearless at railway stations as in my own stable. Now if any one
wants to break in a young horse well, that is the way.

My master often drove me in double harness, with my mother, because she
was steady and could teach me how to go better than a strange horse. She
told me the better I behaved the better I should be treated, and that it
was wisest always to do my best to please my master. "I hope you will
fall into good hands, but a horse never knows who may buy him, or who
may drive him; it is all a chance for us; but still I say, do your best
wherever it is, and keep up your good name."

[Illustration]




CHAPTER IV


BIRTWICK PARK

It was early in May, when there came a man from Gordon's, who took me
away to the Hall. My master said, "Good-bye, Darkie; be a good horse and
always do your best." I could not say "good-bye," so I put my nose in
his hand; he patted me kindly, and I left my first home. I will describe
the stable into which I was taken; this was very roomy, with four good
stalls; a large swinging window opened into the yard, making it pleasant
and airy.

The first stall was a large square one, shut in behind with a wooden
gate; the others were common stalls, good stalls, but not nearly so
large. It had a low rack for hay and a low manger for corn; it was
called a box stall, because the horse that was put into it was not tied
up, but left loose, to do as he liked. It is a great thing to have a box
stall.

Into this fine box the groom put me; it was clean, sweet, and airy. I
never was in a better box than that, and the sides were not so high but
that I could see all that went on through the iron rails that were at
the top.

He gave me some very nice oats, patted me, spoke kindly, and then went
away.

When I had eaten my oats, I looked round. In the stall next to mine
stood a little fat gray pony, with a thick mane and tail, a very pretty
head, and a pert little nose. I put my head up to the iron rails at the
top of my box, and said, "How do you do? What is your name?"

He turned round as far as his halter would allow, held up his head, and
said, "My name is Merrylegs. I am very handsome. I carry the young
ladies on my back, and sometimes I take our mistress out in the low
cart. They think a great deal of me, and so does James. Are you going to
live next door to me in the box?"

I said, "Yes."

"Well, then," he said, "I hope you are good-tempered; I do not like any
one next door who bites."  Just then a horse's head looked over from
the stall beyond; the ears were laid back, and the eye looked rather
ill-tempered. This was a tall chestnut mare, with a long handsome neck;
she looked across to me and said, "So it is you have turned me out of my
box; it is a very strange thing for a colt like you to come and turn a
lady out of her own home."

[Illustration]

"I beg your pardon," I said, "I have turned no one out; the man who
brought me put me here, and I had nothing to do with it. I never had
words yet with horse or mare, and it is my wish to live at peace."

"Well," she said, "we shall see; of course, I do not want to have words
with a young thing like you."  I said no more. In the afternoon, when
she went out, Merrylegs told me all about it.

"The thing is this," said Merrylegs, "Ginger has a habit of biting and
snapping; that is why they call her Ginger, and when she was in the
box-stall, she used to snap very much. One day she bit James in the arm
and made it bleed, and so Miss Flora and Miss Jessie, who are very fond
of me, were afraid to come into the stable. They used to bring me nice
things to eat, an apple, or a carrot, or a piece of bread, but after
Ginger stood in that box, they dared not come, and I missed them very
much. I hope they will now come again, if you do not bite or snap." I
told him I never bit anything but grass, hay, and corn, and could not
think what pleasure Ginger found it.

"Well, I don't think she does find pleasure," says Merrylegs; "it is
just a bad habit; she says no one was ever kind to her, and why should
she not bite? Of course, it is a very bad habit; but I am sure, if all
she says be true, she must have been very ill-used before she came here.
John does all he can to please her; so I think she might be
good-tempered here. You see," he said, with a wise look, "I am twelve
years old; I know a great deal, and I can tell you there is not a better
place for a horse all round the country than this. John is the best
groom that ever was; he has been here fourteen years; and you never saw
such a kind boy as James is, so that it is all Ginger's own fault that
she did not stay in that box."




CHAPTER V


A FAIR START

The name of the coachman was John Manly; he had a wife and one child,
and lived in the coachman's cottage, near the stables.

[Illustration]

The next morning he took me into the yard and gave me a good grooming,
and just as I was going into my box, with my coat soft and bright, the
squire came in to look at me, and seemed pleased. "John," he said, "I
meant to have tried the new horse this morning, but I have other
business. You may as well take him around after breakfast; go by the
common and the Highwood, and back by the water-mill and the river; that
will show his paces."

"I will, sir," said John. After breakfast he came and fitted me with a
bridle. He was very particular in letting out and taking in the straps,
to fit my head comfortably; then he brought a saddle, but it was not
broad enough for my back; he saw it in a minute, and went for another,
which fitted nicely. He rode me first slowly, then a trot, then a
canter, and when we were on the common, he gave me a light touch with
his whip, and we had a splendid gallop.

"Ho, ho! my boy," he said, as he pulled me up, "you would like to follow
the hounds, I think."

As we came back through the park we met the squire and Mrs. Gordon
walking; they stopped, and John jumped off. "Well, John, how does he
go?"

"First rate, sir," answered John; "he is as fleet as a deer, and has a
fine spirit, too; but the lightest touch of the rein will guide him.
Down at the end of the common we met one of those traveling carts hung
all over with baskets, rugs, and such like; you know, sir, many horses
will not pass those carts quietly; he just took a good look at it, and
then went on as quiet and pleasant as could be. They were shooting
rabbits near the Highwood, and a gun went off close by; he pulled up a
little and looked, but he did not stir a step to right or left. I just
held the rein steady and did not hurry him, and it's my opinion he has
not been frightened or ill-used while he was young."

"That's well," said the squire, "I will try him myself to-morrow."

The next day I was brought up for my master. I remembered my mother's
counsel and my good old master's, and I tried to do exactly what he
wanted me to do. I found he was a very good rider, and thoughtful for
his horse, too. When he came home, the lady was at the hall door as he
rode up. "Well, my dear," she said, "how do you like him?"

"He is exactly what John said," he replied; "a pleasanter creature I
never wish to mount. What shall we call him?"

She said: "He is really quite a beauty, and he has such a sweet,
good-tempered face and such a fine, intelligent eye--what do you say to
calling him 'Black Beauty'?"

[Illustration]

"Black Beauty--why, yes, I think that is a very good name. If you like,
it shall be his name"; and so it was.

When John went into the stable, he told James that the master and
mistress had chosen a good sensible name for me, that meant something.
They both laughed, and James said, "If it was not for bringing back the
past, I should have named him Rob Roy, for I never saw two horses more
alike."  "That's no wonder," said John; "didn't you know that Farmer
Grey's old Duchess was the mother of them both?"

I had never heard that before; and so poor Rob Roy who was killed at
that hunt was my brother! I did not wonder that my mother was so
troubled. It seems that horses have no relations; at least they never
know each other after they are sold.

John seemed very proud of me; he used to make my mane and tail almost as
smooth as a lady's hair, and he would talk to me a great deal; of
course, I did not understand all he said, but I learned more and more to
know what he meant, and what he wanted me to do. I grew very fond of
him, he was so gentle and kind; he seemed to know just how a horse
feels, and when he cleaned me he knew the tender places and the ticklish
places; when he brushed my head, he went as carefully over my eyes as if
they were his own, and never stirred up any ill-temper.

James Howard, the stable boy, was just as gentle and pleasant in his
way, so I thought myself well off. There was another man who helped in
the yard, but he had very little to do with Ginger and me.

A few days after this I had to go out with Ginger in the carriage. I
wondered how we should get on together; but except laying her ears back
when I was led up to her, she behaved very well. She did her work
honestly, and did her full share, and I never wish to have a better
partner in double harness. When we came to a hill, instead of slackening
her pace, she would throw her weight right into the collar, and pull
away straight up. We had both the same sort of courage at our work, and
John had oftener to hold us in than to urge us forward; he never had to
use the whip with either of us; then our paces were much the same, and I
found it very easy to keep step with her when trotting, which made it
pleasant, and master always liked it when we kept step well, and so did
John. After we had been out two or three times together we grew quite
friendly and sociable, which made me feel very much at home.

[Illustration]

As for Merrylegs, he and I soon became great friends; he was such a
cheerful, plucky, good-tempered little fellow, that he was a favorite
with every one, and especially with Miss Jessie and Flora, who used to
ride him about in the orchard, and have fine games with him and their
little dog Frisky.




CHAPTER VI


MERRYLEGS

Mr. Blomefield, the vicar, had a large family of boys and girls;
sometimes they used to come and play with Miss Jessie and Flora. One of
the girls was as old as Miss Jessie; two of the boys were older, and
there were several little ones. When they came, there was plenty of work
for Merrylegs, for nothing pleased them so much as getting on him by
turns and riding him all about the orchard and the home paddock, and
this they would do by the hour together.

One afternoon he had been sent out with them a long time, and when James
brought him in and put on his halter, he said: "There, you rogue, mind
how you behave yourself, or we shall get into trouble."

"What have you been doing, Merrylegs?" I asked.

"Oh!" said he, tossing his little head, "I have only been giving those
young people a lesson; they did not know when they had enough, so I just
pitched them off backwards; that was the only thing they could
understand."

"What?" said I, "you threw the children off? I thought you did know
better than that! Did you throw Miss Jessie or Miss Flora?"

[Illustration]

He looked very much offended, and said: "Of course not; I would not do
such a thing for the best oats that ever came into the stable; why, I am
as careful of our young ladies as the master could be, and as for the
little ones, it is I who teach them to ride. When they seem frightened
or a little unsteady on my back, I go as smooth and as quiet as old
pussy when she is after a bird; and when they are all right I go on
again faster, you see, just to use them to it; so don't you trouble
yourself preaching to me; I am the best friend and the best
riding-master those children have. It is not them, it is the boys;
boys," said he, shaking his mane, "are quite different, they must be
broken in, as we were broken in when we were colts, and just be taught
what's what. The other children had ridden me about for nearly two
hours, and then the boys thought it was their turn, and so it was, and I
was quite agreeable. They rode me by turns, and I galloped them about,
up and down the fields and all about the orchard, for a good hour. They
had each cut a great hazel stick for a riding whip, and laid it on a
little too hard; but I took it in good part, till at last I thought we
had had enough, so I stopped two or three times by way of a hint. Boys
think a horse or pony is like a steam engine, and can go as long and as
fast as they please; they never think that a pony can get tired, or have
any feelings; so as the one who was whipping me could not understand, I
just rose up on my hind legs and let him slip off behind--that was all;
he mounted me again, and I did the same. Then the other boy got up, and
as soon as he began to use his stick, I laid him on the grass, and so
on, till they were able to understand, that was all. They were not bad
boys; they don't wish to be cruel. I like them very well; but you see I
had to give them a lesson. When they brought me to James and told him, I
think he was very angry to see such big sticks. He said they were not
for young gentlemen."

"If I had been you," said Ginger, "I would have given those boys a good
kick, and that would have given them a lesson."

"No doubt you would," said Merrylegs; "but then I am not quite such a
fool as to anger our master or make James ashamed of me; besides, those
children are under my charge when they are riding; I tell you they are
entrusted to me. Why, only the other day I heard our master say to Mrs.
Blomefield, 'My dear madam, you need not be anxious about the children;
my old Merrylegs will take as much care of them as you or I could; I
assure you I would not sell that pony for any money, he is so perfectly
good-tempered and trustworthy'; and do you think I am such an ungrateful
brute as to forget all the kind treatment I have had here for five
years, and all the trust they place in me, and turn vicious, because a
couple of ignorant boys used me badly? No, no! you never had a good
place where they were kind to you, and so you don't know, and I am sorry
for you; but I can tell you good places make good horses. I wouldn't
vex our people for anything; I love them, I do," said Merrylegs, and he
gave a low "ho, ho, ho," through his nose, as he used to do in the
morning when he heard James' footstep at the door.




CHAPTER VII


GOING FOR THE DOCTOR

One night I was lying down in my straw fast asleep, when I was suddenly
roused by the stable bell ringing very loud. I heard the door of John's
house open, and his feet running up to the Hall. He was back again in no
time; he unlocked the stable door, and came in, calling out, "Wake up,
Beauty! you must go well now, if ever you did"; and almost before I
could think, he had got the saddle on my back and the bridle on my head.
He just ran around for his coat, and then took me at a quick trot up to
the Hall door. The Squire stood there, with a lamp in his hand. "Now,
John," he said, "ride for your life--that is, for your mistress' life;
there is not a moment to lose. Give this note to Dr. White; give your
horse a rest at the inn, and be back as soon as you can."

John said, "Yes, sir," and was on my back in a minute. The gardener who
lived at the lodge had heard the bell ring, and was ready with the gate
open, and away we went through the park, and through the village, and
down the hill till we came to the toll-gate. John called very loud and
thumped upon the door; the man was soon out and flung open the gate.

"Now," said John, "do you keep the gate open for the doctor; here's the
money," and off we went again.

[Illustration]

There was before us a long piece of level road by the river-side; John
said to me, "Now, Beauty, do your best," and so I did; I wanted no whip
nor spur, and for two miles I galloped as fast I could lay my feet to
the ground; I don't believe that my old grandfather, who won the race at
Newmarket, could have gone faster. When we came to the bridge, John
pulled me up a little and patted my neck. "Well done, Beauty! good old
fellow," he said. He would have let me go slower, but my spirit was up,
and I was off again as fast as before. The air was frosty, the moon was
bright; it was very pleasant. We came through a village, then through a
dark wood, then uphill, then downhill, till after an eight miles' run,
we came to the town, through the streets and into the market-place. It
was all quite still except the clatter of my feet on the
stones--everybody was asleep. The church clock struck three as we drew
up at Dr. White's door. John rang the bell twice, and then knocked at
the door like thunder. A window was thrown up, and the doctor, in his
night-cap, put his head out and said, "What do you want?"

"Mrs. Gordon is very ill, sir; master wants you to go at once; he thinks
she will die if you cannot get there. Here is a note."

"Wait," he said, "I will come."

He shut the window and was soon at the door. "The worst of it is," he
said, "that my horse has been out all day, and is quite done up; my son
has just been sent for, and he has taken the other. What is to be done?
Can I have your horse?"

"He has come at a gallop nearly all the way, sir, and I was to give him
a rest here; but I think my master would not be against it, if you think
fit, sir."

"All right," he said; "I will soon be ready."

John stood by me and stroked my neck. I was very hot. The doctor came
out with his riding-whip. "You need not take that, sir," said John;
"Black Beauty will go till he drops. Take care of him, sir, if you can;
I should not like any harm to come to him."

"No, no, John," said the doctor, "I hope not," and in a minute we had
left John far behind.

[Illustration]

I will not tell about our way back. The doctor was a heavier man than
John, and not so good a rider; however, I did my very best. The man at
the toll-gate had it open. When we came to the hill, the doctor drew me
up. "Now, my good fellow," he said, "take some breath." I was glad he
did, for I was nearly spent, but that breathing helped me on, and soon
we were in the park. Joe was at the lodge gate; my master was at the
Hall door, for he had heard us coming. He spoke not a word; the doctor
went into the house with him, and Joe led me to the stable. I was glad
to get home; my legs shook under me, and I could only stand and pant. I
had not a dry hair on my body, the water ran down my legs, and I steamed
all over--Joe used to say, like a pot on the fire. Poor Joe! he was
young and small, and as yet he knew very little, and his father, who
would have helped him, had been sent to the next village; but I am sure
he did the very best he knew. He rubbed my legs and my chest, but he did
not put my warm cloth on me; he thought I was so hot I should not like
it. Then he gave me a pail full of water to drink; it was cold and very
good, and I drank it all; then he gave me some hay and some corn, and,
thinking he had done right, he went away. Soon I began to shake and
tremble, and turned deadly cold; my legs ached, my loins ached, and my
chest ached, and I felt sore all over. This developed into a strong
inflammation, and I could not draw my breath without pain. John nursed
me night and day. My master, too, often came to see me. "My poor
Beauty," he said one day, "my good horse, you saved your mistress' life,
Beauty; yes, you saved her life." I was very glad to hear that, for it
seems the doctor had said if we had been a little longer it would have
been too late. John told my master he never saw a horse go so fast in
his life. It seems as if the horse knew what was the matter. Of course I
did, though John thought not; at least I knew as much as this--that John
and I must go at the top of our speed, and that it was for the sake of
the mistress.




CHAPTER VIII


THE PARTING

I had lived in this happy place three years, but sad changes were about
to come over us. We heard that our mistress was ill. The doctor was
often at the house, and the master looked grave and anxious. Then we
heard that she must go to a warm country for two or three years. The
news fell upon the household like the tolling of a death-bell. Everybody
was sorry. The master arranged for breaking up his establishment and
leaving England. We used to hear it talked about in our stable; indeed,
nothing else was talked about. John went about his work silent and sad,
and Joe scarcely whistled. There was a great deal of coming and going;
Ginger and I had full work.

The first of the party who went were Miss Jessie and Flora with their
governess. They came to bid us good-bye. They hugged poor Merrylegs
like an old friend, and so indeed he was. Then we heard what had been
arranged for us. Master had sold Ginger and me to an old friend.
Merrylegs he had given to the vicar, who was wanting a pony for Mrs.
Blomefield, but it was on the condition that he should never be sold,
and that when he was past work he should be shot and buried. Joe was
engaged to take care of him and to help in the house, so I thought that
Merrylegs was well off.

[Illustration]

"Have you decided what to do, John?" he said.

"No, sir; I have made up my mind that if I could get a situation with
some first-rate colt-breaker and horse-trainer, it would be the right
thing for me. Many young animals are frightened and spoiled by wrong
treatment, which need not be if the right man took them in hand. I
always get on well with horses, and if I could help some of them to a
fair start I should feel as if I was doing some good. What do you think
of it, sir?"

"I don't know a man anywhere," said master, "that I should think so
suitable for it as yourself. You understand horses, and somehow they
understand you, and I think you could not do better."

The last sad day had come; the footman and the heavy luggage had gone
off the day before, and there were only master and mistress, and her
maid. Ginger and I brought the carriage up to the Hall door, for the
last time. The servants brought out cushions and rugs, and when all were
arranged, master came down the steps carrying the mistress in his arms
(I was on the side next the house, and could see all that went on); he
placed her carefully in the carriage, while the house servants stood
round crying.

"Good-bye, again," he said; "we shall not forget any of you," and he got
in. "Drive on, John." Joe jumped up and we trotted slowly through the
park and through the village, where the people were standing at their
doors to have a last look and to say, "God bless them."

When we reached the railway station, I think mistress walked from the
carriage to the waiting-room. I heard her say in her own sweet voice,
"Good-bye, John; God bless you." I felt the rein twitch, but John made
no answer; perhaps he could not speak. As soon as Joe had taken the
things out of the carriage, John called him to stand by the horses,
while he went on the platform. Poor Joe! He stood close up to our heads
to hide his tears. Very soon the train came puffing into the station;
then two or three minutes, and the doors were slammed to; the guard
whistled and the train glided away, leaving behind it only clouds of
white smoke and some very heavy hearts.

When it was quite out of sight, John came back. "We shall never see her
again," he said--"never." He took the reins, mounted the box, and with
Joe drove slowly home; but it was not our home now.




CHAPTER IX


EARLSHALL

The next morning after breakfast, Joe put Merrylegs into the mistress'
low chaise to take him to the vicarage; he came first and said good-bye
to us, and Merrylegs neighed to us from the yard. Then John put the
saddle on Ginger and the leading rein on me, and rode us across the
country to Earlshall Park, where the Earl of W---- lived. There was a
very fine house and a great deal of stabling. We went into the yard
through a stone gateway, and John asked for Mr. York. It was some time
before he came. He was a fine-looking, middle-aged man, and his voice
said at once that he expected to be obeyed. He was very friendly and
polite to John, and after giving us a slight look, he called a groom to
take us to our boxes, and invited John to take some refreshment.

We were taken to a light, airy stable, and placed in boxes adjoining
each other, where we were rubbed down and fed. In about half an hour
John and York, who was to be our new coachman, came in to see us.

"Now, Manly," he said, after carefully looking at us both, "I can see no
fault in these horses; but we all know that horses have their
peculiarities as well as men, and that sometimes they need different
treatment. I should like to know if there is anything particular in
either of these that you would like to mention."

"Well," said John, "I don't believe there is a better pair of horses in
the country, and right grieved I am to part with them, but they are not
alike. The black one is the most perfect temper I ever knew; I suppose
he has never known a hard word or blow since he was foaled, and all his
pleasure seems to be to do what you wish; but the chestnut, I fancy,
must have had bad treatment; we heard as much from the dealer. She came
to us snappish and suspicious, but when she found what sort of place
ours was, it all went off by degrees; for three years I have never seen
the smallest sign of temper, and if she is well treated there is not a
better, more willing animal than she is. But she has naturally a more
irritable constitution than the black horse; flies tease her more;
anything wrong in her harness frets her more; and if she were ill-used
or unfairly treated she would not be unlikely to give tit for tat. You
know that many high-mettled horses will do so."

[Illustration]

"Of course," said York, "I quite understand; but you know it is not easy
in stables like these to have all the grooms just what they should be. I
do my best, and there I must leave it. I'll remember what you have said
about the mare."  They were going out of the stable, when John stopped,
and said, "I had better mention that we have never used the check-rein
with either of them; the black horse never had one on, and the dealer
said it was the gag-bit that spoiled the other's temper."

"Well," said York, "if they come here, they must wear the check-rein. I
prefer a loose rein myself, and his lordship is always very reasonable
about horses; but my lady--that's another thing; she will have style,
and if her carriage horses are not reined up tight she wouldn't look at
them. I always stand out against the gag-bit, and shall do so, but it
must be tight up when my lady rides!"

"I am sorry for it," said John; "but I must go now, or I shall lose the
train."

He came round to each of us to pat and speak to us for the last time;
his voice sounded very sad. I held my face close to him; that was all I
could do to say good-bye; and then he was gone, and I have never seen
him since.

The next day Lord W---- came to look at us; he seemed pleased with our
appearance. "I have great confidence in these horses," he said, "from
the character my friend Gordon has given me of them. Of course they are
not a match in color, but my idea is that they will do very well for the
carriage while we are in the country. Before we go to London I must try
to match Baron; the black horse, I believe, is perfect for riding."

York then told him what John had said about us.

"Well," said he, "you must keep an eye to the mare, and put the
check-rein easy; I dare say they will do very well with a little
humoring at first. I'll mention it to your lady."

In the afternoon we were harnessed and put in the carriage and led round
to the front of the house. It was all very grand, and three times as
large as the old house at Birtwick, but not half so pleasant, if a horse
may have an opinion. Two footmen were standing ready, dressed in drab
livery, with scarlet breeches and white stockings. Presently we heard
the rustling sound of silk as my lady came down the flight of stone
steps. She stepped round to look at us; she was a tall, proud-looking
woman, and did not seem pleased about something, but she said nothing,
and got into the carriage. This was the first time of wearing a
check-rein, and I must say, though it certainly was a nuisance not to be
able to get my head down now and then, it did not pull my head higher
than I was accustomed to carry it. I felt anxious about Ginger, but she
seemed to be quiet and content.

[Illustration]

The next day we were again at the door, and the footmen as before; we
heard the silk dress rustle, and the lady came down the steps, and in an
imperious voice, she said, "York, you must put those horses' heads
higher, they are not fit to be seen."

York got down, and said very respectfully, "I beg your pardon, my lady,
but these horses have not been reined up for three years, and my lord
said it would be safer to bring them to it by degrees; but, if your
ladyship pleases, I can take them up a little more."  "Do so," she
said.

York came round to our heads and shortened the rein himself, one hole, I
think. Every little makes a difference, be it for better or worse, and
that day we had a steep hill to go up. Then I began to understand what I
had heard of. Of course, I wanted to put my head forward and take the
carriage up with a will as we had been used to do; but no, I had to pull
with my head up now, and that took all the spirit out of me, and the
strain came on my back and legs. When we came in, Ginger said, "Now you
see what it is like; but this is not bad, and if it does not get much
worse than this I shall say nothing about it, for we are very well
treated here; but if they strain me up tight, why, let 'em look out! I
can't bear it, and I won't."

Day by day, hole by hole, our bearing-reins were shortened, and instead
of looking forward with pleasure to having my harness put on, as I used
to do, I began to dread it. Ginger too seemed restless, thought she said
very little. The worst was yet to come.




CHAPTER X


A STRIKE FOR LIBERTY

One day my lady came down later than usual, and the silk rustled more
than ever. "Drive to the Duchess of B----'s," she said, and then after a
pause, "Are you never going to get those horses' heads up, York? Raise
them at once, and let us have no more of this humoring nonsense."

York came to me first, while the groom stood at Ginger's head. He drew
my head back and fixed the rein so tight that it was almost
intolerable; then he went to Ginger, who was impatiently jerking her
head up and down against the bit, as was her way now. She had a good
idea of what was coming, and the moment York took the rein off the
turret in order to shorten it, she took her opportunity, and reared up
so suddenly that York had his nose roughly hit and his hat knocked off;
the groom was nearly thrown off his legs. At once they both flew to her
head, but she was a match for them, and went on plunging, rearing, and
kicking in a most desperate manner; at last she kicked right over the
carriage pole and fell down, after giving me a severe blow on my near
quarter. There is no knowing what further mischief she might have done,
had not York sat himself down flat on her head to prevent her
struggling, at the same time calling out, "Unbuckle the black horse! Run
for the winch and unscrew the carriage pole! Cut the trace here,
somebody, if you can't unhitch it!" The groom soon set me free from
Ginger and the carriage, and led me to my box. He just turned me in as I
was, and ran back to York. I was much excited by what had happened, and
if I had ever been used to kick or rear I am sure I should have done it
then; but I never had, and there I stood, angry, sore in my leg, my head
still strained up to the terret on the saddle, and no power to get it
down. I was very miserable, and felt much inclined to kick the first
person who came near me.

Before long, however, Ginger was led in by two grooms, a good deal
knocked about and bruised. York came with her and gave us orders, and
then came to look at me. In a moment he let down my head.

"Confound these check-reins!" he said to himself; "I thought we should
have some mischief soon. Master will be sorely vexed. But here, if a
woman's husband can't rule her, of course a servant can't; so I wash my
hands of it, and if she can't get to the Duchess' garden party I can't
help it."

York did not say this before the men; he always spoke respectfully when
they were by. Now he felt me all over, and soon found the place above my
hock where I had been kicked. It was swelled and painful; he ordered it
to be sponged with hot water, and then some lotion was put on.

[Illustration]

Lord W--- was much put out when he learned what had happened; he blamed
York for giving way to his mistress, to which he replied that in future
he would much prefer to receive his orders only from his lordship. I
thought York might have stood up better for his horses, but perhaps I am
no judge.

Ginger was never put into the carriage again, but when she was well of
her bruises one of Lord W----'s younger sons said he should like to have
her; he was sure she would make a good hunter. As for me, I was obliged
still to go in the carriage, and had a fresh partner called Max; he had
always been used to the tight rein. I asked him how it was he bore it.

"Well," he said, "I bear it because I must; but it is shortening my
life, and it will shorten yours too, if you have to stick to it."

"Do you think," I said, "that our masters know how bad it is for us?"

"I can't say," he replied, "but the dealers and the horse-doctors know
it very well. I was at a dealer's once, who was training me and another
horse to go as a pair; he was getting our heads up, and he said, a
little higher and a little higher every day. A gentleman who was there
asked him why he did so. 'Because,' said he, 'people won't buy them
unless we do. The fashionable people want their horses to carry their
heads high and to step high. Of course, it is very bad for the horses,
but then it is good for trade. The horses soon wear up, and they come
for another pair.' That," said Max, "is what he said in my hearing, and
you can judge for yourself."

What I suffered with that rein for four months in my lady's carriage
would be hard to describe; but I am quite sure that, had it lasted much
longer, either my health or my temper would have given way. Before
that, I never knew what it was to foam at the mouth, but now the action
of the sharp bit on my tongue and jaw, and the constrained position of
my head and throat, always caused me to froth at the mouth more or less.
Some people think it very fine to see this, and say, "What fine,
spirited creatures!" But it is just as unnatural for horses as for men
to foam at the mouth; it is a sure sign of some discomfort, and should
be attended to. Besides this, there was a pressure on my windpipe, which
often made my breathing very uncomfortable; when I returned from my
work, my neck and chest were strained and painful, my mouth and tongue
tender, and I felt worn and depressed.

[Illustration]

In my old home I always knew that John and my master were my friends;
but here, although in many ways I was well treated, I had no friend.
York might have known, and very likely did know, how that rein harassed
me; but I suppose he took it as a matter of course that could not be
helped; at any rate, nothing was done to relieve me.




CHAPTER XI


A HORSE FAIR

No doubt a horse fair is a very amusing place to those who have nothing
to lose; at any rate, there is plenty to see.

Long strings of young horses out of the country, fresh from the marshes,
and droves of shaggy little Welsh ponies, no higher than Merrylegs; and
hundreds of cart horses of all sorts, some of them with their long tails
braided up and tied with scarlet cord; and a good many like myself,
handsome and high-bred, but fallen into the middle class, through some
accident or blemish, unsoundness of wind, or some other complaint. There
were some splendid animals quite in their prime, and fit for anything,
they were throwing out their legs and showing off their paces in high
style, as they were trotted out with a leading rein, the groom running
by the side. But round in the background there were a number of poor
things, sadly broken down with hard work, with their knees knuckling
over and their hind legs swinging out at every step; and there were some
very dejected-looking old horses, with the under-lip hanging down and
the ears lying back heavily, as if there was no more pleasure in life,
and no more hope; there were some so thin you might see all their ribs,
and some with old sores on their backs and hips. These were sad sights
for a horse to look upon, who knows not but he may come to the same
state.  I was put with some useful-looking horses, and a good many
people came to look at us. The gentlemen always turned from me when they
saw my broken knees; though the man who had me swore it was only a slip
in the stall.

The first thing was to pull my mouth open, then to look at my eyes, then
feel all the way down my legs and give me a hard feel of the skin and
flesh, and then try my paces. It was wonderful what a difference there
was in the way these things were done. Some did it in a rough, off-hand
way, as if one was only a piece of wood; while others would take their
hands gently over one's body, with a pat now and then, as much as to
say, "By your leave." Of course, I judged a good deal of the buyers by
their manners to myself.

There was one man, I thought, if he would buy me, I should be happy. He
was not a gentleman. He was rather a small man, but well made, and quick
in all his motions. I knew in a moment, by the way he handled me, that
he was used to horses; he spoke gently, and his gray eye had a kindly,
cheery look in it. It may seem strange to say--but it is true all the
same--that the clean, fresh smell there was about him made me take to
him; no smell of old beer and tobacco, which I hated, but a fresh smell
as if he had come out of a hayloft. He offered twenty-three pounds for
me; but that was refused, and he walked away. I looked after him, but he
was gone, and a very hard-looking, loud-voiced man came. I was
dreadfully afraid he would have me; but he walked off. One or two more
came who did not mean business. Then the hard-faced man came back again
and offered twenty-three pounds. A very close bargain was being driven,
for my salesman began to think he should not get all he asked, and must
come down; but just then the gray-eyed man came back again. I could not
help reaching out my head toward him. He stroked my face kindly. "Well,
old chap," he said, "I think we should suit each other. I'll give
twenty-four for him."

"Say twenty-five, and you shall have him."  "Twenty-four then," said my
friend, in a very decided tone, "and not another sixpence--yes, or no?"

"Done," said the salesman; "and you may depend upon it there's a
monstrous deal of quality in that horse, and if you want him for cab
work he's a bargain."

[Illustration]

The money was paid on the spot, and my new master took my halter, and
led me out of the fair to an inn, where he had a saddle and bridle
ready. He gave me a good feed of oats, and stood by while I ate it,
talking to himself and talking to me. Half an hour after, we were on our
way to London, through pleasant lanes and country roads, until we came
into the great thoroughfare, on which we traveled steadily, till in the
twilight we reached the great city. The gas lamps were already lighted;
there were streets and streets crossing each other, for mile upon mile.
I thought we should never come to the end of them. At last, in passing
through one, we came to a long cab stand, when my rider called out in a
cheery voice, "Good-night, Governor!"

"Hallo!" cried a voice. "Have you got a good one?"

"I think so," replied my owner.

"I wish you luck with him."

"Thank ye, Governor," and he rode on. We soon turned up one of the
side-streets, and about half-way up that we turned into a very narrow
street, with rather poor-looking houses on one side, and what seemed to
be coach-houses and stables on the other.

My owner pulled up at one of the houses and whistled. The door flew
open, and a young woman, followed by a little girl and boy, ran out.
There was a very lively greeting as my rider dismounted. "Now, then,
Harry, my boy, open the gates, and mother will bring us the lantern."

The next minute they were all round me in the stable yard. "Is he
gentle, father?" "Yes, Dolly, as gentle as your own kitten; come and pat
him." At once the little hand was patting about all over my shoulder
without fear. How good it felt!

"Let me get him a bran mash while you rub him down," said the mother.
"Do, Polly, it's just what he wants; and I know you've got a beautiful
mash ready for me."

I was led into a comfortable, clean-smelling stall with plenty of dry
straw, and after a capital supper, I lay down, thinking I was going to
be happy.




CHAPTER XII


A LONDON CAB HORSE

My new master's name was Jeremiah Barker, but as every one called him
Jerry, I shall do the same. Polly, his wife, was just as good a match as
a man could have. She was a plump, trim, tidy little woman, with smooth,
dark hair, dark eyes, and a merry little mouth. The boy was nearly
twelve years old, a tall, frank, good-tempered lad; and little Dorothy
(Dolly they called her) was her mother over again, at eight years old.
They were all wonderfully fond of each other; I never knew such a happy,
merry family before or since. Jerry had a cab of his own, and two
horses, which he drove and attended to himself. His other horse was a
tall, white, rather large-boned animal, called Captain. He was old now,
but when he was young he must have been splendid; he had still a proud
way of holding his head and arching his neck; in fact, he was a
high-bred, fine-mannered, noble old horse, every inch of him. He told me
that in his early youth he went to the Crimean War; he belonged to an
officer in the cavalry, and used to lead the regiment.

The next morning, when I was well-groomed, Polly and Dolly came into the
yard to see me and make friends. Harry had been helping his father since
the early morning, and had stated his opinion that I should turn out "a
regular brick." Polly brought me a slice of apple, and Dolly a piece of
bread, and made as much of me as if I had been the Black Beauty of olden
time. It was a great treat to be petted again and talked to in a gentle
voice, and I let them see as well as I could that I wished to be
friendly. Polly thought I was very handsome, and a great deal too good
for a cab, if it was not for the broken knees.

"Of course there's no one to tell us whose fault that was," said Jerry,
"and as long as I don't know I shall give him the benefit of the doubt;
for a firmer, neater stepper I never rode. We'll call him Jack, after
the old one--shall we, Polly?"

"Do," she said, "for I like to keep a good name going."

[Illustration]

Captain went out in the cab all the morning. Harry came in after school
to feed me and give me water. In the afternoon I was put into the cab.
Jerry took as much pains to see if the collar and bridle fitted
comfortably as if he had been John Manly over again. There was no
check-rein, no curb, nothing but a plain ring snaffle. What a blessing
that was!

After driving through the side-street we came to the large cabstand
where Jerry had said "Good-night." On one side of this wide street were
high houses with wonderful shop fronts, and on the other was an old
church and churchyard, surrounded by iron palisades. Alongside these
iron rails a number of cabs were drawn up, waiting for passengers; bits
of hay were lying about on the ground; some of the men were standing
together talking; some were sitting on their boxes reading the
newspaper; and one or two were feeding their horses with bits of hay,
and giving them a drink of water. We pulled up in the rank at the back
of the last cab. Two or three men came round and began to look at me and
pass their remarks.

"Very good for a funeral," said one.

"Too smart-looking," said another, shaking his head in a very wise way;
"you'll find out something wrong one of these fine mornings, or my name
isn't Jones."

"Well," said Jerry pleasantly, "I suppose I need not find it out till it
find me out, eh? And if so, I'll keep up my spirits a little longer."

Then there came up a broad-faced man, dressed in a great gray coat with
great gray capes and great white buttons, a gray hat, and a blue
comforter loosely tied around his neck; his hair was gray, too; but he
was a jolly-looking fellow, and the other men made way for him. He
looked me all over, as if he had been going to buy me; and then
straightening himself up with a grunt, he said, "He's the right sort for
you, Jerry; I don't care what you gave for him, he'll be worth it." Thus
my character was established on the stand. This man's name was Grant,
but he was called "Gray Grant," or "Governor Grant." He had been the
longest on that stand of any of the men, and he took it upon himself to
settle matters and stop disputes.

The first week of my life as a cab horse was very trying. I had never
been used to London, and the noise, the hurry, the crowds of horses,
carts, and carriages, that I had to make my way through, made me feel
anxious and harassed; but I soon found that I could perfectly trust my
driver, and then I made myself easy, and got used to it.

[Illustration]

Jerry was as good a driver as I had ever known; and what was better, he
took as much thought for his horses as he did for himself. He soon found
out that I was willing to work and do my best; and he never laid the
whip on me, unless it was gently drawing the end of it over my back,
when I was to go on; but generally I knew this quite well by the way in
which he took up the reins; and I believe his whip was more frequently
stuck up by his side than in his hand.

In a short time I and my master understood each other, as well as horse
and man can do. In the stable, too, he did all that he could for our
comfort. The stalls were the old-fashioned style, too much on the slope;
but he had two movable bars fixed across the back of our stalls, so that
at night, when we were resting, he just took off our halters and put up
the bars, and thus we could turn about and stand whichever way we
pleased, which is a great comfort.

Jerry kept us very clean, and gave us as much change of food as he
could, and always plenty of it; and not only that, but he always gave us
plenty of clean fresh water, which he allowed to stand by us both night
and day, except of course when we came in warm. Some people say that a
horse ought not to drink all he likes; but I know if we are allowed to
drink when we want it we drink only a little at a time, and it does us a
great deal more good than swallowing down half a bucketful at a time
because we have been left without till we are thirsty and miserable.
Some grooms will go home to their beer and leave us for hours with our
dry hay and oats and nothing to moisten them; then of course we gulp
down too much at once, which helps to spoil our breathing and sometimes
chills our stomachs. But the best thing that we had here was our Sundays
for rest! we worked so hard in the week, that I do not think we could
have kept up to it, but for that day; besides, we had then time to enjoy
each other's company.




CHAPTER XIII


DOLLY AND A REAL GENTLEMAN

The winter came in early, with a great deal of cold and wet. There was
snow, or sleet, or rain, almost every day for weeks, changing only for
keen driving winds or sharp frosts. The horses all felt it very much.
When it is a dry cold, a couple of good thick rugs will keep the warmth
in us; but when it is soaking rain, they soon get wet through and are no
good. Some of the drivers had a waterproof cover to throw over, which
was a fine thing; but some of the men were so poor that they could not
protect either themselves or their horses, and many of them suffered
very much that winter. When we horses had worked half the day we went to
our dry stables, and could rest; while they had to sit on their boxes,
sometimes staying out as late as one or two o'clock in the morning, if
they had a party to wait for.

[Illustration]

When the streets were slippery with frost or snow, that was the worst of
all for us horses; one mile of such traveling with a weight to draw, and
no firm footing, would take more out of us than four on a good road;
every nerve and muscle of our bodies is on the strain to keep our
balance; and, added to this, the fear of falling is more exhausting than
anything else. If the roads are very bad, indeed, our shoes are roughed,
but that makes us feel nervous at first.

One cold windy day, Dolly brought Jerry a basin of something hot, and
was standing by him while he ate it. He had scarcely begun, when a
gentleman, walking toward us very fast, held up his umbrella. Jerry
touched his hat in return, gave the basin to Dolly, and was taking off
my cloth, when the gentleman, hastening up, cried out, "No, no, finish
your soup, my friend; I have not much time to spare, but I can wait till
you have done, and set your little girl safe on the pavement."

So saying, he seated himself in the cab. Jerry thanked him kindly, and
came back to Dolly. "There, Dolly, that's a gentleman; that's a real
gentleman, Dolly; he has got time and thought for the comfort of a poor
cabman and a little girl."

[Illustration]

Jerry finished his soup, set the child across, and then took his orders
to drive to Clapham Rise. Several times after that, the same gentleman
took our cab. I think he was very fond of dogs and horses, for whenever
we took him to his own door, two or three dogs would come bounding out
to meet him. Sometimes he came round and patted me saying in his quiet,
pleasant way: "This horse has got a good master, and he deserves it." It
was a very rare thing for any one to notice the horse that had been
working for him. I have known ladies to do it now and then, and this
gentleman, and one or two others have given me a pat and a kind word;
but ninety-nine out of a hundred would as soon think of patting the
steam engine that drew the train.

One day, he and another gentleman took our cab; they
stopped at a shop in R---- Street, and while his friend went in, he
stood at the door. A little ahead of us on the other side of the street,
a cart with two very fine horses was standing before some wine vaults;
the carter was not with them, and I cannot tell how long they had been
standing, but they seemed to think they had waited long enough, and
began to move off. Before they had gone, many paces, the carter came
running out and caught them. He seemed furious at their having moved,
and with whip and rein punished them brutally, even beating them about
the head. Our gentleman saw it all, and stepping quickly across the
street, said in a decided voice: "If you don't stop that directly, I'll
have you arrested for leaving your horses, and for brutal conduct."

The man, who had clearly been drinking, poured forth some abusive
language, but he left off knocking the horses about, and taking the
reins, got into his cart; meantime our friend had quietly taken a
notebook from his pocket, and looking at the name and address painted on
the cart, he wrote something down.

"What do you want with that?" growled the carter, as he cracked his whip
and was moving on. A nod and a grim smile was the only answer he got.

On returning to the cab, our friend was joined by his companion, who
said laughing, "I should have thought, Wright, you had enough business
of your own to look after, without troubling yourself about other
people's horses and servants."

Our friend stood still for a moment, and throwing his head a little
back, "Do you know why this world is as bad as it is?"

"No," said the other.

"Then I'll tell you. It is because people think only about their own
business, and won't trouble themselves to stand up for the oppressed,
nor bring the wrong-doer to light. I never see a wicked thing like this
without doing what I can, and many a master has thanked me for letting
him know how his horses have been used."

"I wish there were more gentlemen like you, sir," said Jerry, "for they
are wanted badly enough in this city."




CHAPTER XIV


POOR GINGER

One day, while our cab and many others were waiting outside one of the
parks where music was playing, a shabby old cab drove up beside ours.
The horse was an old worn-out chestnut, with an ill-kept coat, and bones
that showed plainly through it, the knees knuckled over, and the
fore-legs were very unsteady. I had been eating some hay, and the wind
rolled a little lock of it that way, and the poor creature put out her
long thin neck and picked it up, and then turned round and looked about
for more. There was a hopeless look in the dull eye that I could not
help noticing, and then, as I was thinking where I had seen that horse
before, she looked full at me and said, "Black Beauty, is that you?"

It was Ginger! but how changed! The beautifully arched and glossy neck
was now straight, and lank, and fallen in; the clean, straight legs and
delicate fetlocks were swelled; the joints were grown out of shape with
hard work; the face, that was once so full of spirit and life, was now
full of suffering, and I could tell by the heaving of her sides, and her
frequent cough, how bad her breath was.  Our drivers were standing
together a little way off, so I sidled up to her a step or two, that we
might have a little quiet talk. It was a sad tale that she had to tell.

After a twelvemonth's run off at Earlshall, she was considered to be fit
for work again, and was sold to a gentleman. For a little while she got
on very well, but after a longer gallop than usual, the old strain
returned, and after being rested and doctored she was again sold. In
this way she changed hands several times, but always getting lower down.

[Illustration]

"And so at last," said she, "I was bought by a man who keeps a number of
cabs and horses, and lets them out. You look well off, and I am glad of
it, but I could not tell you what my life has been. When they found out
my weakness, they said I was not worth what they gave for me, and that I
must go into one of the low cabs, and just be used up; that is what they
are doing, whipping and working with never one thought of what I
suffer--they paid for me, and must get it out of me, they say. The man
who hires me now pays a deal of money to the owner every day, and so he
has to get it out of me, too; and so it's all the week round and round,
with never a Sunday rest."

I said, "You used to stand up for yourself if you were ill-used."

"Ah!" she said, "I did once, but it's no use; men are strongest, and if
they are cruel and have no feeling, there is nothing that we can do but
just bear it--bear it on and on to the end. I wish the end was come, I
wish I was dead. I have seen dead horses, and I am sure they do not
suffer pain."

I was very much troubled, and I put my nose up to hers, but I could say
nothing to comfort her. I think she was pleased to see me, for she said,
"You are the only friend I ever had."

Just then her driver came up, and with a tug at her mouth, backed her
out of the line and drove off, leaving me very sad, indeed.

A short time after this, a cart with a dead horse in it passed our cab
stand. The head hung out of the cart tail, the lifeless tongue was
slowly dropping with blood; and the sunken eyes! but I can't speak of
them, the sight was too dreadful! It was a chestnut horse with a long,
thin neck. I saw a white streak down the forehead. I believe it was
Ginger; I hoped it was, for then her troubles would be over. Oh! if men
were more merciful, they would shoot us before we came to such misery.




CHAPTER XV


At a sale I found myself in company with a lot of horses--some lame,
some broken-winded, some old, and some that I am sure it would have been
merciful to shoot.

[Illustration]

The buyers and sellers, too, many of them, looked not much better off
than the poor beasts they were bargaining about. There were poor old
men, trying to get a horse or pony for a few pounds, that might drag
about some little wood or coal cart. There were poor men trying to sell
a worn-out beast for two or three pounds, rather than have the greater
loss of killing him. Some of them looked as if poverty and hard times
had hardened them all over; but there were others that I would have
willingly used the last of my strength in serving; poor and shabby, but
kind and humane, with voices that I could trust. There was one tottering
old man that took a great fancy to me, and I to him, but I was not
strong enough--it was an anxious time! Coming from the better part of
the fair, I noticed a man who looked like a gentleman farmer, with a
young boy by his side; he had a broad back and round shoulders, a kind,
ruddy face, and he wore a broad-brimmed hat. When he came up to me and
my companions, he stood still, and gave a pitiful look round upon us. I
saw his eye rest on me; I had still a good mane and tail, which did
something for my appearance. I pricked my ears and looked at him.

"There's a horse, Willie, that has known better days."

"Poor old fellow!" said the boy; "do you think, grandpapa, he was ever a
carriage horse?"

"Oh, yes! my boy," said the farmer, coming closer, "he might have been
anything when he was young; look at his nostrils and his ears, the shape
of his neck and shoulder; there's a deal of breeding about that horse."
He put out his hand and gave me a kind pat on the neck. I put out my
nose in answer to his kindness; the boy stroked my face.

"Poor old fellow! see, grandpapa, how well he understands kindness.
Could not you buy him and make him young again as you did with
Ladybird?"

"My dear boy, I can't make all old horses young; besides, Ladybird was
not so very old, as she was run down and badly used."

"Well, grandpapa, I don't believe that this one is old; look at his mane
and tail. I wish you would look into his mouth, and then you could tell;
though he is so very thin, his eyes are not sunk like some old horses."
The old gentleman laughed. "Bless the boy! he is as horsey as his old
grandfather."

"But do look at his mouth, grandpapa, and ask the price; I am sure he
would grow young in our meadows."

The man who had brought me for sale now put in his word. "The young
gentleman's a real knowing one, sir. Now, the fact is, this 'ere hoss is
just pulled down with over-work in the cabs; he's not an old one, and I
heard as how the vetenary said that a six-months' run off would set him
right up, being as how his wind was not broken. I've had the tending of
him these ten days past, and a gratefuller, pleasanter animal I never
met with, and 'twould be worth a gentleman's while to give a five-pound
note for him, and let him have a chance. I'll be bound he'd be worth
twenty pounds next spring."

The old gentleman laughed, and the little boy looked up eagerly. "O,
grandpapa, did you not say the colt sold for five pounds more than you
expected? You would not be poorer if you did buy this one."

The farmer slowly felt my legs, which were much swelled and strained;
then he looked at my mouth. "Thirteen or fourteen, I should say; just
trot him out, will you?"

I arched my poor thin neck, raised my tail a little and threw out my
legs as well as I could, for they were very stiff.

"What is the lowest you will take for him?" said the farmer as I came
back. "Five pounds, sir; that was the lowest price my master set."

"'Tis a speculation," said the old gentleman, shaking his head, but at
the same time slowly drawing out his purse, "quite a speculation! Have
you any more business here?" he said, counting the sovereigns into his
hand. "No, sir, I can take him for you to the inn, if you please."

"Do so, I am now going there."




CHAPTER XVI


MY LAST HOME

One day, during this summer, the groom cleaned and dressed me with such
extraordinary care that I thought some new change must be at hand; he
trimmed my fetlocks and legs, passed the tar-brush over my hoofs, and
even parted my forelock. I think the harness had an extra polish. Willie
seemed half-anxious, half-merry, as he got into the chaise with his
grandfather. "If the ladies take to him," said the old gentleman,
"they'll be suited and he'll be suited; we can but try."

[Illustration]

At the distance of a mile or two from the village, we came to a pretty,
low house, with a lawn and shrubbery at the front, and a drive up to the
door. Willie rang the bell, and asked if Miss Blomefield or Miss Ellen
was at home. Yes, they were. So, while Willie stayed with me, Mr.
Thoroughgood went into the house. In about ten minutes he returned,
followed by three ladies; one tall, pale lady, wrapped in a white shawl,
leaned on a younger lady, with dark eyes and a merry face; the other, a
very stately-looking person, was Miss Blomefield. They all came and
looked at me and asked questions. The younger lady--that was Miss
Ellen--took to me very much; she said she was sure she should like me, I
had such a good face. The tall, pale lady said she should always be
nervous in riding behind a horse that had once been down, as I might
come down again, and if I did she should never get over the fright."

"You see, ladies," said Mr. Thoroughgood, "many first-rate horses have
had their knees broken through the carelessness of their drivers,
without any fault of their own, and from what I see of this horse, I
should say that is his case; but, of course, I do not wish to influence
you. If you incline, you can have him on trial, and then your coachman
will see what he thinks of him."

"You have always been such a good adviser to us about our horses," said
the stately lady, "that your recommendation would go a long way with me,
and if my sister Lavinia sees no objection, we will accept your offer of
a trial, with thanks."

It was then arranged that I should be sent for the next day. In the
morning a smart-looking young man came for me; at first, he looked
pleased; but when he saw my knees, he said in a disappointed voice: "I
didn't think, sir, you would have recommended a blemished horse like
that."

"'Handsome is that handsome does,'" said my master; "you are only taking
him on trial, and I am sure you will do fairly by him, young man; if he
is not safe as any horse you ever drove, send him back."

I was led to my new home, placed in a comfortable stable, fed, and left
to myself. The next day, when my groom was cleaning my face, he said:
"That is just like the star that Black Beauty had, he is much the same
height, too; I wonder where he is now."

A little further on, he came to the place in my neck where I was bled,
and where a little knot was left in the skin. He almost started, and
begun to look me over carefully, talking to himself. "White star in the
forehead, one white foot on the off side, this little knot just in that
place"; then, looking at the middle of my back--"and as I am alive,
there is that little patch of white hair that John used to call
'Beauty's threepenny bit.' It must be Black Beauty! Why, Beauty!
Beauty! do you know me? little Joe Green, that almost killed you?" And
he began patting and patting me as if he was quite overjoyed.

I could not say that I remembered him, for now he was a fine grown young
fellow, with black whiskers, and a man's voice, but I was sure he knew
me, and that he was Joe Green, and I was very glad. I put my nose up to
him, and tried to say that we were friends. I never saw a man so
pleased.

"Give you a fair trial! I should think so, indeed! I wonder who the
rascal was that broke your knees, my old Beauty! you must have been
badly served out somewhere; well, well, it won't be my fault if you
haven't good times of it now. I wish John Manly was here to see you."

In the afternoon I was put into a low Park chair and brought to the
door. Miss Ellen was going to try me, and Green went with her. I soon
found that she was a good driver, and she seemed pleased with my paces.
I heard Joe telling her about me, and that he was sure I was Squire
Gordon's old "Black Beauty."

When we returned, the other sisters came out to hear how I had behaved
myself. She told them what she had just heard, and said: "I shall
certainly write to Mrs. Gordon, and tell her that her favorite horse has
come to us. How pleased she will be!"

After this I was driven every day for a week or so, and as I appeared to
be quite safe, Miss Lavinia at last ventured out in the small close
carriage. After this it was quite decided to keep me and call me by my
old name of Black Beauty.

I have now lived in this happy place a whole year.


[Illustration]



***END OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK BLACK BEAUTY, YOUNG FOLKS' EDITION***


******* This file should be named 11860.txt or 11860.zip *******


This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
http://www.gutenberg.net/1/1/8/6/11860


Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions
will be renamed.

Creating the works from public domain print editions means that no
one owns a United States copyright in these works, so the Foundation
(and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United States without
permission and without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules,
set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply to
copying and distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works to
protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.  Project
Gutenberg is a registered trademark, and may not be used if you
charge for the eBooks, unless you receive specific permission.  If you
do not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the
rules is very easy.  You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose
such as creation of derivative works, reports, performances and
research.  They may be modified and printed and given away--you may do
practically ANYTHING with public domain eBooks.  Redistribution is
subject to the trademark license, especially commercial
redistribution.



*** START: FULL LICENSE ***

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
Gutenberg-tm License (available with this file or online at
http://gutenberg.net/license).


Section 1.  General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works

1.A.  By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement.  If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your possession.
If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

1.B.  "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark.  It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement.  There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  See
paragraph 1.C below.  There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement
and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.  See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C.  The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the Foundation"
or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection of Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works.  Nearly all the individual works in the
collection are in the public domain in the United States.  If an
individual work is in the public domain in the United States and you are
located in the United States, we do not claim a right to prevent you from
copying, distributing, performing, displaying or creating derivative
works based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg
are removed.  Of course, we hope that you will support the Project
Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting free access to electronic works by
freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of
this agreement for keeping the Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with
the work.  You can easily comply with the terms of this agreement by
keeping this work in the same format with its attached full Project
Gutenberg-tm License when you share it without charge with others.

1.D.  The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work.  Copyright laws in most countries are in
a constant state of change.  If you are outside the United States, check
the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
before downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or
creating derivative works based on this work or any other Project
Gutenberg-tm work.  The Foundation makes no representations concerning
the copyright status of any work in any country outside the United
States.

1.E.  Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1.  The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear prominently
whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work on which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed,
copied or distributed:

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.net

1.E.2.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is derived
from the public domain (does not contain a notice indicating that it is
posted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can be copied
and distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees
or charges.  If you are redistributing or providing access to a work
with the phrase "Project Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the
work, you must comply either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1
through 1.E.7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the
Project Gutenberg-tm trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or
1.E.9.

1.E.3.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additional
terms imposed by the copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linked
to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works posted with the
permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.

1.E.4.  Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5.  Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6.  You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including any
word processing or hypertext form.  However, if you provide access to or
distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format other than
"Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official version
posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.net),
you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy upon
request, of the work in its original "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other
form.  Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7.  Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8.  You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works provided
that

- You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
     the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
     you already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  The fee is
     owed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he
     has agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the
     Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation.  Royalty payments
     must be paid within 60 days following each date on which you
     prepare (or are legally required to prepare) your periodic tax
     returns.  Royalty payments should be clearly marked as such and
     sent to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the
     address specified in Section 4, "Information about donations to
     the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."

- You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
     you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
     does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
     License.  You must require such a user to return or
     destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium
     and discontinue all use of and all access to other copies of
     Project Gutenberg-tm works.

- You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of any
     money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
     electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days
     of receipt of the work.

- You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
     distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9.  If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work or group of works on different terms than are set
forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from
both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael
Hart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark.  Contact the
Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1.  Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
public domain works in creating the Project Gutenberg-tm
collection.  Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain
"Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other intellectual
property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or other medium, a
computer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot be read by
your equipment.

1.F.2.  LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees.  YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH F3.  YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3.  LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from.  If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
your written explanation.  The person or entity that provided you with
the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
refund.  If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
providing it to you may choose to give you a second opportunity to
receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the second copy
is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without further
opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4.  Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS,' WITH NO OTHER
WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTIBILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5.  Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates the
law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall be
interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by
the applicable state law.  The invalidity or unenforceability of any
provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.

1.F.6.  INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in accordance
with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works,
harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees,
that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do
or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project Gutenberg-tm
work, (b) alteration, modification, or additions or deletions to any
Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any Defect you cause.


Section  2.  Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers.  It exists
because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need, is critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come.  In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future generations.
To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
and how your efforts and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4
and the Foundation web page at http://www.pglaf.org.


Section 3.  Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service.  The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541.  Its 501(c)(3) letter is posted at
http://pglaf.org/fundraising.  Contributions to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent
permitted by U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr. S.
Fairbanks, AK, 99712., but its volunteers and employees are scattered
throughout numerous locations.  Its business office is located at
809 North 1500 West, Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887, email
business@pglaf.org.  Email contact links and up to date contact
information can be found at the Foundation's web site and official
page at http://pglaf.org

For additional contact information:
     Dr. Gregory B. Newby
     Chief Executive and Director
     gbnewby@pglaf.org

Section 4.  Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide
spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment.  Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States.  Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements.  We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance.  To
SEND DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any
particular state visit http://pglaf.org

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States.  U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
methods and addresses.  Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including including checks, online payments and credit card
donations.  To donate, please visit: http://pglaf.org/donate


Section 5.  General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.

Professor Michael S. Hart is the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm
concept of a library of electronic works that could be freely shared
with anyone.  For thirty years, he produced and distributed Project
Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.

Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the U.S.
unless a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we do not necessarily
keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper edition.

Each eBook is in a subdirectory of the same number as the eBook's
eBook number, often in several formats including plain vanilla ASCII,
compressed (zipped), HTML and others.

Corrected EDITIONS of our eBooks replace the old file and take over
the old filename and etext number.  The replaced older file is renamed.
VERSIONS based on separate sources are treated as new eBooks receiving
new filenames and etext numbers.

Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search facility:

http://www.gutenberg.net

This Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.

EBooks posted prior to November 2003, with eBook numbers BELOW #10000,
are filed in directories based on their release date.  If you want to
download any of these eBooks directly, rather than using the regular
search system you may utilize the following addresses and just
download by the etext year.

http://www.ibiblio.org/gutenberg/etext06

    (Or /etext 05, 04, 03, 02, 01, 00, 99,
     98, 97, 96, 95, 94, 93, 92, 92, 91 or 90)

EBooks posted since November 2003, with etext numbers OVER #10000, are
filed in a different way.  The year of a release date is no longer part
of the directory path.  The path is based on the etext number (which is
identical to the filename).  The path to the file is made up of single
digits corresponding to all but the last digit in the filename.  For
example an eBook of filename 10234 would be found at:

http://www.gutenberg.net/1/0/2/3/10234

or filename 24689 would be found at:
http://www.gutenberg.net/2/4/6/8/24689

An alternative method of locating eBooks:
http://www.gutenberg.net/GUTINDEX.ALL

*** END: FULL LICENSE ***
